Utah statutes.
9-7-202.   Appointment of director.

(1)  The chief administrative officer of the division shall be a director appointed by the executive director with the concurrence of the board.

(2)  The director shall have a degree from an institution approved by the American Library Association in library science and shall have demonstrated administrative ability.



Enacted by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

